Ohio, session 136, HB411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 2152.20, 2152.21, 4507.05, 5
4507.071, 4508.02, and 4510.311 of the Revised Code be amended 6
to read as follows: 7
Sec. 2152.20. (A) If a child is adjudicated a delinquent 8
child or a juvenile traffic offender, the court may order any of 9
the following dispositions, in addition to any other disposition 10
authorized or required by this chapter: 11
(1) Impose a fine in accordance with the following 12
schedule: 13
(a) For an act that would be a minor misdemeanor or an 14
unclassified misdemeanor if committed by an adult, a fine not to 15
exceed fifty dollars; 16
(b) For an act that would be a misdemeanor of the fourth 17
degree if committed by an adult, a fine not to exceed one 18
hundred dollars; 19

H. B. No. 411 Page 2
As Introduced
(c) For an act that would be a misdemeanor of the third 20
degree if committed by an adult, a fine not to exceed one 21
hundred fifty dollars; 22
(d) For an act that would be a misdemeanor of the second 23
degree if committed by an adult, a fine not to exceed two 24
hundred dollars; 25
(e) For an act that would be a misdemeanor of the first 26
degree if committed by an adult, a fine not to exceed two 27
hundred fifty dollars; 28
(f) For an act that would be a felony of the fifth degree 29
or an unclassified felony if committed by an adult, a fine not 30
to exceed three hundred dollars; 31
(g) For an act that would be a felony of the fourth degree 32
if committed by an adult, a fine not to exceed four hundred 33
dollars; 34
(h) For an act that would be a felony of the third degree 35
if committed by an adult, a fine not to exceed seven hundred 36
fifty dollars; 37
(i) For an act that would be a felony of the second degree 38
if committed by an adult, a fine not to exceed one thousand 39
dollars; 40
(j) For an act that would be a felony of the first degree 41
if committed by an adult, a fine not to exceed one thousand five 42
hundred dollars; 43
(k) For an act that would be aggravated murder or murder 44
if committed by an adult, a fine not to exceed two thousand 45
dollars. 46
(2) Require the child to pay costs; 47

H. B. No. 411 Page 3
As Introduced
(3) Unless the child's juvenile traffic offense would be a 48
minor misdemeanor if committed by an adult or could be disposed 49
of by the juvenile traffic violations bureau serving the court 50
under Traffic Rule 13.1 if the court has established a juvenile 51
traffic violations bureau, require the child to make restitution 52
to the victim of the child's delinquent act or juvenile traffic 53
offense or, if the victim is deceased, to a survivor or the 54
estate of the victim in an amount based upon the victim's 55
economic loss caused by or related to the delinquent act or 56
juvenile traffic offense. The court may not require a child to 57
make restitution pursuant to this division if the child's 58
juvenile traffic offense would be a minor misdemeanor if 59
committed by an adult or could be disposed of by the juvenile 60
traffic violations bureau serving the court under Traffic Rule 61
13.1 if the court has established a juvenile traffic violations 62
bureau. If the court requires restitution under this division, 63
the restitution shall be made directly to the victim in open 64
court or to the probation department that serves the 65
jurisdiction or the clerk of courts on behalf of the victim. 66
The victim, victim's representative, victim's attorney, if 67
applicable, the prosecuting attorney, or the delinquent child or 68
juvenile traffic offender may provide information relevant to 69
the determination of the amount of restitution. The amount the 70
court orders as restitution shall not exceed the amount of the 71
economic loss suffered by the victim as a direct and proximate 72
result of the delinquent act or juvenile traffic offense. If the 73
court decides to or is required to order restitution under this 74
division and the amount of the restitution is disputed by the 75
victim or survivor, victim's estate, victim's representative, or 76
victim's attorney, if applicable, or by the delinquent child or 77
juvenile traffic offender, the court shall hold a hearing on the 78

H. B. No. 411 Page 4
As Introduced
restitution. The court shall determine the amount of full 79
restitution by a preponderance of the evidence. All restitution 80
payments shall be credited against any recovery of economic loss 81
in a civil action brought by or on behalf of the victim against 82
the delinquent child or juvenile traffic offender or the 83
delinquent child's or juvenile traffic offender's parent, 84
guardian, or other custodian. 85
If the court requires restitution under this division, the 86
court may order that the delinquent child or juvenile traffic 87
offender pay a surcharge, in an amount not exceeding five per 88
cent of the amount of restitution otherwise ordered under this 89
division, to the entity responsible for collecting and 90
processing the restitution payments. 91
The victim, survivor of the victim, or victim's estate may 92
request that the prosecuting authority file a motion, or the 93
delinquent child or juvenile traffic offender may file a motion, 94
for modification of the payment terms of any restitution ordered 95
under this division. If the court grants the motion, it may 96
modify the payment terms as it determines appropriate. 97
(4) Require the child to reimburse any or all of the costs 98
incurred for services or sanctions provided or imposed, 99
including, but not limited to, the following: 100
(a) All or part of the costs of implementing any community 101
control imposed as a disposition under section 2152.19 of the 102
Revised Code, including a supervision fee; 103
(b) All or part of the costs of confinement in a 104
residential facility described in section 2152.19 of the Revised 105
Code or in a department of youth services institution, 106
including, but not limited to, a per diem fee for room and 107

H. B. No. 411 Page 5
As Introduced
board, the costs of medical and dental treatment provided, and 108
the costs of repairing property the delinquent child damaged 109
while so confined. The amount of reimbursement ordered for a 110
child under this division shall not exceed the total amount of 111
reimbursement the child is able to pay as determined at a 112
hearing and shall not exceed the actual cost of the confinement. 113
The court may collect any reimbursement ordered under this 114
division. If the court does not order reimbursement under this 115
division, confinement costs may be assessed pursuant to a 116
repayment policy adopted under section 2929.37 of the Revised 117
Code and division (D) of section 307.93, division (A) of section 118
341.19, division (C) of section 341.23 or 753.16, division (C) 119
of section 2301.56, or division (B) of section 341.14, 753.02, 120
753.04, or 2947.19 of the Revised Code. 121
(5) If a juvenile traffic offender has never been 122
adjudicated a juvenile traffic offender prior to having 123
committed the act that would be a minor misdemeanor or 124
unclassified misdemeanor if committed by an adult, the court may 125
order the offender to complete a program approved under division 126
(B) of section 4510.311 of the Revised Code in lieu of the 127
imposition of a fine and assessment of points against the 128
offender's temporary instruction permit or probationary license. 129
(B) Chapter 2981. of the Revised Code applies to a child 130
who is adjudicated a delinquent child for violating section 131
2923.32 or 2923.42 of the Revised Code or for committing an act 132
that, if committed by an adult, would be a felony drug abuse 133
offense. 134
(C) The court may hold a hearing if necessary to determine 135
whether a child is able to pay a sanction under this section. 136
(D) If a child who is adjudicated a delinquent child is 137

H. B. No. 411 Page 6
As Introduced
indigent, the court shall consider imposing a term of community 138
service under division (A) of section 2152.19 of the Revised 139
Code in lieu of imposing a financial sanction under this 140
section. If a child who is adjudicated a delinquent child is not 141
indigent, the court may impose a term of community service under 142
that division in lieu of, or in addition to, imposing a 143
financial sanction under this section. The court may order the 144
performance of community service to generate funds for 145
restitution. 146
If a child fails to pay a financial sanction imposed under 147
this section, the court may impose a term of community service 148
in lieu of the sanction. 149
(E) The clerk of the court, or another person authorized 150
by law or by the court to collect a financial sanction imposed 151
under this section, may do any of the following: 152
(1) Enter into contracts with one or more public agencies 153
or private vendors for the collection of the amounts due under 154
the financial sanction, which amounts may include interest from 155
the date of imposition of the financial sanction; 156
(2) Permit payment of all, or any portion of, the 157
financial sanction in installments, by credit or debit card, by 158
another type of electronic transfer, or by any other reasonable 159
method, within any period of time, and on any terms that the 160
court considers just, except that the maximum time permitted for 161
payment shall not exceed five years. The clerk may pay any fee 162
associated with processing an electronic transfer out of public 163
money and may charge the fee to the delinquent child. 164
(3) To defray administrative costs, charge a reasonable 165
fee to a child who elects a payment plan rather than a lump sum 166

H. B. No. 411 Page 7
As Introduced
payment of a financial sanction. 167
Sec. 2152.21. (A) Unless division (C) of this section 168
applies, if a child is adjudicated a juvenile traffic offender, 169
the court may make any of the following orders of disposition: 170
(1) Impose costs and one or more financial sanctions in 171
accordance with section 2152.20 of the Revised Code; 172
(2) Suspend the child's driver's license, probationary 173
driver's license, or temporary instruction permit for a definite 174
period not exceeding two years or suspend the registration of 175
all motor vehicles registered in the name of the child for a 176
definite period not exceeding two years. A child whose license 177
or permit is so suspended is ineligible for issuance of a 178
license or permit during the period of suspension. At the end of 179
the period of suspension, the child shall not be reissued a 180
license or permit until the child has paid any applicable 181
reinstatement fee and complied with all requirements governing 182
license reinstatement. 183
(3) Place the child on community control; 184
(4) If the child is adjudicated a juvenile traffic 185
offender for an act other than an act that would be a minor 186
misdemeanor if committed by an adult and other than an act that 187
could be disposed of by the juvenile traffic violations bureau 188
serving the court under Traffic Rule 13.1 if the court has 189
established a juvenile traffic violations bureau, require the 190
child to make restitution pursuant to division (A)(3) of section 191
2152.20 of the Revised Code; 192
(5)(a) If the child is adjudicated a juvenile traffic 193
offender for committing a violation of division (A) of section 194
4511.19 of the Revised Code or of a municipal ordinance that is 195

H. B. No. 411 Page 8
As Introduced
substantially equivalent to that division, commit the child, for 196
not longer than five days, to either of the following: 197
(i) The temporary custody of a detention facility or 198
district detention facility established under section 2152.41 of 199
the Revised Code; 200
(ii) The temporary custody of any school, camp, 201
institution, or other facility for children operated in whole or 202
in part for the care of juvenile traffic offenders of that 203
nature by the county, by a district organized under section 204
2151.65 or 2152.41 of the Revised Code, or by a private agency 205
or organization within the state that is authorized and 206
qualified to provide the care, treatment, or placement required. 207
(b) If an order of disposition committing a child to the 208
temporary custody of a home, school, camp, institution, or other 209
facility of that nature is made under division (A)(5)(a) of this 210
section, the length of the commitment shall not be reduced or 211
diminished as a credit for any time that the child was held in a 212
place of detention or shelter care, or otherwise was detained, 213
prior to entry of the order of disposition. 214
(6) If, after making a disposition under divisions (A)(1) 215
to (5) of this section, the court finds upon further hearing 216
that the child has failed to comply with the orders of the court 217
and the child's operation of a motor vehicle constitutes the 218
child a danger to the child and to others, the court may make 219
any disposition authorized by divisions (A)(1), (4), (5), and 220
(8) of section 2152.19 of the Revised Code, except that the 221
child may not be committed to or placed in a secure correctional 222
facility unless authorized by division (A)(5) of this section, 223
and commitment to or placement in a detention facility may not 224
exceed twenty-four hours. 225

H. B. No. 411 Page 9
As Introduced
(7) If the child is adjudicated a first-time juvenile 226
traffic offender for an act that would be a minor misdemeanor or 227
unclassified misdemeanor if committed by an adult or that could 228
be disposed of by the juvenile traffic violations bureau serving 229
the court under Traffic Rule 13.1 if the court has established a 230
juvenile traffic violations bureau, require the child to 231
complete an advanced juvenile driver improvement program 232
pursuant to division (B) of section 4510.311 of the Revised 233
Code. A court shall not impose any fines if the child submits a 234
certificate of completion to the court. 235
(B) If a child is adjudicated a juvenile traffic offender 236
for violating division (A) or (B) of section 4511.19 of the 237
Revised Code, in addition to any order of disposition made under 238
division (A) of this section, the court shall impose a class six 239
suspension of the temporary instruction permit, probationary 240
driver's license, or driver's license issued to the child from 241
the range specified in division (A)(6) of section 4510.02 of the 242
Revised Code. The court, in its discretion, may terminate the 243
suspension if the child attends and satisfactorily completes a 244
drug abuse or alcohol abuse education, intervention, or 245
treatment program specified by the court. During the time the 246
child is attending a program as described in this division, the 247
court shall retain the child's temporary instruction permit, 248
probationary driver's license, or driver's license issued, and 249
the court shall return the permit or license if it terminates 250
the suspension as described in this division. 251
(C) If a child is adjudicated a juvenile traffic offender 252
for violating division (B)(1) of section 4513.263 of the Revised 253
Code, the court shall impose the appropriate fine set forth in 254
division (G) of that section. If a child is adjudicated a 255
juvenile traffic offender for violating division (B)(3) of 256

H. B. No. 411 Page 10
As Introduced
section 4513.263 of the Revised Code and if the child is sixteen 257
years of age or older, the court shall impose the fine set forth 258
in division (G)(2) of that section. If a child is adjudicated a 259
juvenile traffic offender for violating division (B)(3) of 260
section 4513.263 of the Revised Code and if the child is under 261
sixteen years of age, the court shall not impose a fine but may 262
place the child on probation or community control. 263
(D) A juvenile traffic offender is subject to sections 264
4509.01 to 4509.78 of the Revised Code. 265
Sec. 4507.05. (A) The registrar of motor vehicles, or a 266
deputy registrar, upon receiving an application for a temporary 267
instruction permit and a temporary instruction permit 268
identification card for a driver's license from any person who 269
is at least fifteen years six months of age, may issue such a 270
permit and identification card entitling the applicant to drive 271
a motor vehicle, other than a commercial motor vehicle, upon the 272
highways under the following conditions: 273
(1) If the permit is issued to a person who is at least 274
fifteen years six months of age, but less than sixteen years of 275
age: 276
(a) The permit and identification card are in the holder's 277
immediate possession; 278
(b) The holder is accompanied by an eligible adult who 279
actually occupies the seat beside the permit holder and does not 280
have a prohibited concentration of alcohol in the whole blood, 281
blood serum or plasma, breath, or urine as provided in division 282
(A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code; 283
(c) The total number of occupants of the vehicle does not 284
exceed the total number of occupant restraining devices 285

H. B. No. 411 Page 11
As Introduced
originally installed in the motor vehicle by its manufacturer, 286
and each occupant of the vehicle is wearing all of the available 287
elements of a properly adjusted occupant restraining device. 288
(2) If the permit is issued to a person who is at least 289
sixteen years of age: 290
(a) The permit and identification card are in the holder's 291
immediate possession; 292
(b) The holder is accompanied by a licensed operator who 293
is at least twenty-one years of age, is actually occupying a 294
seat beside the driver, and does not have a prohibited 295
concentration of alcohol in the whole blood, blood serum or 296
plasma, breath, or urine as provided in division (A) of section 297
4511.19 of the Revised Code; 298
(c) The total number of occupants of the vehicle does not 299
exceed the total number of occupant restraining devices 300
originally installed in the motor vehicle by its manufacturer, 301
and each occupant of the vehicle is wearing all of the available 302
elements of a properly adjusted occupant restraining device. 303
(B) The registrar or a deputy registrar, upon receiving 304
from any person an application for a temporary instruction 305
permit and temporary instruction permit identification card to 306
operate a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle or motor scooter, or 307
motorized bicycle, may issue such a permit and identification 308
card entitling the applicant, while having the permit and 309
identification card in the applicant's immediate possession, to 310
drive a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle or motor scooter, under 311
the restrictions prescribed in section 4511.53 of the Revised 312
Code, or to drive a motorized bicycle under restrictions 313
determined by the registrar. A temporary instruction permit and 314

H. B. No. 411 Page 12
As Introduced
temporary instruction permit identification card to operate a 315
motorized bicycle may be issued to a person fourteen or fifteen 316
years old. 317
(C) Any permit and identification card issued under this 318
section shall be issued in the same manner as a driver's 319
license, upon a form to be furnished by the registrar. A 320
temporary instruction permit to drive a motor vehicle other than 321
a commercial motor vehicle shall be valid for a period of one 322
year and six months. 323
(D) Any person having in the person's possession a valid 324
and current driver's license or motorcycle operator's license or 325
endorsement issued to the person by another jurisdiction 326
recognized by this state is exempt from obtaining a temporary 327
instruction permit for a driver's license and from submitting to 328
the examination for a temporary instruction permit and the 329
regular examination for obtaining a driver's license or 330
motorcycle operator's endorsement in this state if the person 331
does all of the following: 332
(1) Submits to and passes vision screening as provided in 333
section 4507.12 of the Revised Code; 334
(2) Surrenders to the registrar or deputy registrar the 335
person's driver's license issued by the other jurisdiction; and 336
(3) Complies with all other applicable requirements for 337
issuance by this state of a driver's license, driver's license 338
with a motorcycle operator's endorsement, or restricted license 339
to operate a motorcycle. 340
If the person does not comply with all the requirements of 341
this division, the person shall submit to the regular 342
examination for obtaining a driver's license or motorcycle 343

H. B. No. 411 Page 13
As Introduced
operator's endorsement in this state in order to obtain such a 344
license or endorsement. 345
(E) The registrar may adopt rules governing the use of 346
temporary instruction permits and temporary instruction permit 347
identification cards. 348
(F)(1) No holder of a permit issued under division (A) of 349
this section shall operate a motor vehicle upon a highway or any 350
public or private property used by the public for purposes of 351
vehicular travel or parking in violation of the conditions 352
established under division (A) of this section. 353
(2) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(2) of 354
this section, no holder of a permit that is issued under 355
division (A) of this section and that is issued on or after July 356
1, 1998, and who has not attained the age of under eighteen 357
years, of age shall operate a motor vehicle upon a highway or 358
any public or private property used by the public for purposes 359
of vehicular travel or parking between the hours of midnight and 360
six a.m. 361
The holder of a permit issued under division (A) of this 362
section on or after July 1, 1998, who has not attained the age 363
of under eighteen years, of age may operate a motor vehicle upon 364
a highway or any public or private property used by the public 365
for purposes of vehicular travel or parking between the hours of 366
midnight and six a.m. if, at the time of such operation, the 367
holder is accompanied by the holder's parent, guardian, or 368
custodian, and the parent, guardian, or custodian holds a 369
current valid driver's or commercial driver's license issued by 370
this state, is actually occupying a seat beside the permit 371
holder, and does not have a prohibited concentration of alcohol 372
in the whole blood, blood serum or plasma, breath, or urine as 373

H. B. No. 411 Page 14
As Introduced
provided in division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code. 374
(G)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 375
contrary, no law enforcement officer shall cause the operator of 376
a motor vehicle being operated on any street or highway to stop 377
the motor vehicle for the sole purpose of determining whether 378
each occupant of the motor vehicle is wearing all of the 379
available elements of a properly adjusted occupant restraining 380
device as required by division (A) of this section, or for the 381
sole purpose of issuing a ticket, citation, or summons if the 382
requirement in that division has been or is being violated, or 383
for causing the arrest of or commencing a prosecution of a 384
person for a violation of that requirement. 385
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 386
contrary, no law enforcement officer shall cause the operator of 387
a motor vehicle being operated on any street or highway to stop 388
the motor vehicle for the sole purpose of determining whether a 389
violation of division (F)(2) of this section has been or is 390
being committed or for the sole purpose of issuing a ticket, 391
citation, or summons for such a violation or for causing the 392
arrest of or commencing a prosecution of a person for such 393
violation. 394
(H) As used in this section: 395
(1) "Eligible adult" means any of the following: 396
(a) An instructor of a driver training course approved by 397
the department of public safety; 398
(b) Any of the following persons who holds a current valid 399
driver's or commercial driver's license issued by this state: 400
(i) A parent, guardian, or custodian of the permit holder; 401

H. B. No. 411 Page 15
As Introduced
(ii) A person twenty-one years of age or older who acts in 402
loco parentis of the permit holder. 403
(2) "Occupant restraining device" has the same meaning as 404
in section 4513.263 of the Revised Code. 405
(I) Whoever violates division (F)(1) or (2) of this 406
section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. 407
Sec. 4507.071. (A) The registrar of motor vehicles or any 408
deputy registrar shall not issue a driver's license to any 409
person under eighteen years of age, except that the registrar or 410
a deputy registrar may issue a probationary license to a person 411
who is at least sixteen years of age and has held a temporary 412
instruction permit for a period of at least six monthsone year. 413
(B)(1)(a) No holder of a probationary driver's license who 414
has held the license for less than twelve months shall operate a 415
motor vehicle upon a highway or any public or private property 416
used by the public for purposes of vehicular travel or parking 417
between the hours of midnight and six a.m. unless the holder is 418
accompanied by the holder's parent or guardian. 419
(b) No holder of a probationary driver's license who has 420
held the license for twelve months or longer shall operate a 421
motor vehicle upon a highway or any public or private property 422
used by the public for purposes of vehicular travel or parking 423
between the hours of one a.m. and five a.m. unless the holder is 424
accompanied by the holder's parent or guardian. 425
(2)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, 426
division (B)(1)(a) of this section does not apply to the holder 427
of a probationary driver's license who is doing either any of 428
the following: 429
(i) Traveling to or from work between the hours of 430

H. B. No. 411 Page 16
As Introduced
midnight and six a.m., provided that the holder has in the 431
holder's immediate possession written documentation from the 432
holder's employer.; 433
(ii) Traveling to or from an official function sponsored 434
by the school the holder attends between the hours of midnight 435
and six a.m., provided that the holder has in the holder's 436
immediate possession written documentation from an appropriate 437
official of the school; 438
(iii) Traveling to or from an official religious event 439
between the hours of midnight and six a.m., provided that the 440
holder has in the holder's immediate possession written 441
documentation from an appropriate official affiliated with the 442
event. 443
(b) Division (B)(1)(b) of this section does not apply to 444
the holder of a probationary driver's license who is doing 445
either any of the following: 446
(i) Traveling to or from work between the hours of one 447
a.m. and five a.m., provided that the holder has in the holder's 448
immediate possession written documentation from the holder's 449
employer.; 450
(ii) Traveling to or from an official function sponsored 451
by the school the holder attends between the hours of one a.m. 452
and five a.m., provided that the holder has in the holder's 453
immediate possession written documentation from an appropriate 454
official of the school; 455
(iii) Traveling to or from an official religious event 456
between the hours of one a.m. and five a.m., provided that the 457
holder has in the holder's immediate possession written 458
documentation from an appropriate official affiliated with the 459

H. B. No. 411 Page 17
As Introduced
event. 460
(3) An employer, school official, or official affiliated 461
with a religious event is not liable in damages in a civil 462
action for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that 463
allegedly arises from, or is related to, the fact that the 464
employer, school official, or official affiliated with a 465
religious event provided the holder of a probationary driver's 466
license with the written documentation described in division (B) 467
(2) of this section. 468
The registrar of motor vehicles shall make available at no 469
cost a form to serve as the written documentation described in 470
division (B)(2) of this section, and employers, school 471
officials, officials affiliated with religious events, and 472
holders of probationary driver's licenses may utilize that form 473
or may choose to utilize any other written documentation to meet 474
the requirements of that division. 475
(4) No holder of a probationary driver's license who has 476
held the license for less than twelve months shall operate a 477
motor vehicle upon a highway or any public or private property 478
used by the public for purposes of vehicular travel or parking 479
with more than one person who is not a family member occupying 480
the vehicle unless the probationary license holder is 481
accompanied by the probationary license holder's parent, 482
guardian, or custodian. 483
(C) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of 484
division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section if, at the time of the 485
violation, an emergency existed that required the holder of the 486
probationary driver's license to operate a motor vehicle in 487
violation of division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section or the 488
holder was an emancipated minor. 489

H. B. No. 411 Page 18
As Introduced
(D)(1) If a person is issued a probationary driver's 490
license prior to attaining the age of seventeen years and the 491
person pleads guilty to, is convicted of, or is adjudicated in 492
juvenile court of having committed a moving violation during the 493
six-month period commencing on the date on which the person is 494
issued the probationary driver's license, the court with 495
jurisdiction over the violation may order that the holder must 496
be accompanied by the holder's parent or guardian whenever the 497
holder is operating a motor vehicle upon a highway or any public 498
or private property used by the public for purposes of vehicular 499
travel or parking for a period not to exceed six months or the 500
date the holder attains the age of seventeen years, whichever 501
occurs first. 502
(2) Any person who is subject to the operating 503
restrictions established under division (D)(1) of this section 504
as a result of a first moving violation may petition the court 505
for driving privileges without being accompanied by the holder's 506
parent or guardian during the period of time determined by the 507
court under that division. In granting the driving privileges, 508
the court shall specify the purposes of the privileges and shall 509
issue the person appropriate forms setting forth the privileges 510
granted. If a person is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or is 511
adjudicated in juvenile court of having committed a second or 512
subsequent moving violation, the court with jurisdiction over 513
the violation may terminate any driving privileges previously 514
granted under this division. 515
(3) No person shall violate any operating restriction 516
imposed under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section. 517
(E) No holder of a probationary license shall operate a 518
motor vehicle upon a highway or any public or private property 519

H. B. No. 411 Page 19
As Introduced
used by the public for purposes of vehicular travel or parking 520
unless the total number of occupants of the vehicle does not 521
exceed the total number of occupant restraining devices 522
originally installed in the motor vehicle by its manufacturer, 523
and each occupant of the vehicle is wearing all of the available 524
elements of a properly adjusted occupant restraining device. 525
(F) A restricted license may be issued to a person who is 526
fourteen or fifteen years of age upon proof of hardship 527
satisfactory to the registrar of motor vehicles. 528
(G) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 529
contrary, no law enforcement officer shall cause the operator of 530
a motor vehicle being operated on any street or highway to stop 531
the motor vehicle for the sole purpose of determining whether 532
each occupant of the motor vehicle is wearing all of the 533
available elements of a properly adjusted occupant restraining 534
device as required by division (E) of this section, or for the 535
sole purpose of issuing a ticket, citation, or summons if the 536
requirement in that division has been or is being violated, or 537
for causing the arrest of or commencing a prosecution of a 538
person for a violation of that requirement. 539
(H) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 540
contrary, no law enforcement officer shall cause the operator of 541
a motor vehicle being operated on any street or highway to stop 542
the motor vehicle for the sole purpose of determining whether a 543
violation of division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section has been 544
or is being committed or for the sole purpose of issuing a 545
ticket, citation, or summons for such a violation or for causing 546
the arrest of or commencing a prosecution of a person for such 547
violation. 548
(I) As used in this section: 549

H. B. No. 411 Page 20
As Introduced
(1) "Occupant restraining device" has the same meaning as 550
in section 4513.263 of the Revised Code. 551
(2) "Family member" of a probationary license holder 552
includes any of the following: 553
(a) A spouse; 554
(b) A child or stepchild; 555
(c) A parent, stepparent, grandparent, or parent-in-law; 556
(d) An aunt or uncle; 557
(e) A sibling, whether of the whole or half blood or by 558
adoption, a brother-in-law, or a sister-in-law; 559
(f) A son or daughter of the probationary license holder's 560
stepparent if the stepparent has not adopted the probationary 561
license holder; 562
(g) An eligible adult, as defined in section 4507.05 of 563
the Revised Code. 564
(3) "Moving violation" means any violation of any statute 565
or ordinance that regulates the operation of vehicles, 566
streetcars, or trackless trolleys on the highways or streets. 567
"Moving violation" does not include a violation of section 568
4513.263 of the Revised Code or a substantially equivalent 569
municipal ordinance, or a violation of any statute or ordinance 570
regulating pedestrians or the parking of vehicles, vehicle size 571
or load limitations, vehicle fitness requirements, or vehicle 572
registration. 573
(J) Whoever violates division (B)(1) or (4), (D)(3), or 574
(E) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. 575
Sec. 4508.02. (A)(1) The director of public safety, 576

H. B. No. 411 Page 21
As Introduced
subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt and 577
prescribe such rules concerning the administration and 578
enforcement of this chapter as are necessary to protect the 579
public. The rules shall require an assessment of the holder of a 580
probationary instructor license. The director shall inspect the 581
school facilities and equipment of applicants and licensees and 582
examine applicants for instructor's licenses. 583
(2) The director shall adopt rules governing online driver 584
education courses that may be completed via the internet to 585
satisfy the classroom instruction under division (C) of this 586
section. The rules shall do all of the following: 587
(a) Establish standards that an online driver training 588
enterprise must satisfy to be licensed to offer an online driver 589
education course via the internet, including, at a minimum, 590
proven expertise in providing driver education and an acceptable 591
infrastructure capable of providing secure online driver 592
education in accord with advances in internet technology. The 593
rules shall allow an online driver training enterprise to be 594
affiliated with a licensed driver training school offering in- 595
person classroom instruction, but shall not require such an 596
affiliation. 597
(b) Establish content requirements that an online driver 598
education course must satisfy to be approved as equivalent to 599
twenty-four hours of in-person classroom instruction; 600
(c) Establish attendance standards, including a maximum 601
number of course hours that may be completed in a twenty-four- 602
hour period; 603
(d) Allow an enrolled applicant to begin the required 604
eight hours of actual behind-the-wheel instruction upon 605

H. B. No. 411 Page 22
As Introduced
completing all twenty-four hours of course instruction; 606
(e) Establish any other requirements necessary to regulate 607
online driver education. 608
(B) The director shall administer and enforce this 609
chapter. 610
(C) The rules shall require twenty-four hours of completed 611
in-person classroom instruction or the completion of an 612
approved, equivalent online driver education course offered via 613
the internet by a licensed online driver training enterprise, 614
followed by eight hours of actual behind-the-wheel instruction 615
conducted on public streets and highways of this state for all 616
beginning drivers of noncommercial motor vehicles who are 617
required to complete the training under section 4507.21 of the 618
Revised Code. The rules shall allow beginning drivers of 619
noncommercial motor vehicles to complete the driver education 620
course at any point while holding a valid temporary instruction 621
permit. The rules also shall require the classroom instruction 622
or online driver education course for such drivers to include 623
instruction on both all of the following: 624
(1) The dangers of driving a motor vehicle while 625
distracted, including while using an electronic wireless 626
communications device, or engaging in any other activity that 627
distracts a driver from the safe and effective operation of a 628
motor vehicle; 629
(2) The dangers of driving a motor vehicle while under the 630
influence of a controlled substance, prescription medication, or 631
alcohol; 632
(3) Proper techniques to use when driving a motor vehicle 633
in the following circumstances: 634

H. B. No. 411 Page 23
As Introduced
(a) Weather conditions, including rain, fog, hail, sleet, 635
snow, and high winds; 636
(b) Adverse road conditions, including potholes, road 637
debris, construction, and road detours; 638
(c) Road hazards caused by animals, including animals that 639
enter the roadway unexpectedly; 640
(d) Incidents involving road rage, speeding, reckless 641
driving, erratic driving, and other aggressive driving 642
behaviors; 643
(e) Incidents during which the motor vehicle skids, 644
slides, or otherwise moves in an uncontrolled manner. 645
(D) The rules shall state the minimum hours for classroom 646
and behind-the-wheel instruction required for beginning drivers 647
of commercial trucks, commercial cars, buses, and commercial 648
tractors, trailers, and semitrailers. 649
(E)(1) The department of public safety may charge a fee to 650
each online driver training enterprise in an amount sufficient 651
to pay the actual expenses the department incurs in the 652
regulation of online driver education courses. 653
(2) The department shall supply to each licensed online 654
driver training enterprise certificates to be used for 655
certifying an applicant's enrollment in an approved online 656
driver education course and a separate certificate to be issued 657
upon successful completion of an approved online driver 658
education course. The certificates shall be numbered serially. 659
The department may charge a fee to each online driver training 660
enterprise per certificate supplied to pay the actual expenses 661
the department incurs in supplying the certificates. 662

H. B. No. 411 Page 24
As Introduced
(F) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with 663
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing an abbreviated driver 664
training course for adults. 665
Sec. 4510.311. (A) The director of public safety shall 666
establish standards for juvenile driver improvement programs and 667
shall approve any programs that meet the established standards. 668
The standards established by the director shall require a 669
minimum of five hours of classroom instruction, with at least 670
three hours devoted to driver skill requirements and two hours 671
devoted to juvenile driver information related to the driving 672
records of drivers under eighteen years of age, driver 673
perceptions, and the value of the traffic laws. The standards 674
also shall require a person whose probationary driver's license 675
was suspended under section 4510.31 of the Revised Code to 676
undertake and pass, as successful completion of an approved 677
juvenile driver improvement program, the driver's license 678
examination that a person who holds a temporary instruction 679
permit is required to undertake and pass in order to be issued a 680
probationary driver's license. The person shall pay the 681
applicable fee that is required to accompany an application for 682
a driver's license as prescribed in division (E) of section 683
4507.23 of the Revised Code. The director shall prescribe the 684
requirements for the curriculum to be provided as well as other 685
program directives. Only those programs approved by the director 686
shall be acceptable for reinstatement of the driving privileges 687
of a person whose probationary driver's license was suspended 688
under section 4510.31 of the Revised Code. 689
(B) The director of public safety shall establish 690
standards for advanced juvenile driver improvement programs and 691
shall approve any programs that meet the established standards. 692
The standards established by the director shall require a 693

H. B. No. 411 Page 25
As Introduced
minimum of two hours of classroom instruction with a focus on 694
driving physics, vehicle dynamics, proper vision techniques, and 695
teen driver statistics. The standards also shall require a 696
minimum of four hours of emergency driving skills development 697
through "behind-the-wheel" driving exercises with a focus on 698
vehicle control in emergency and adverse weather driving 699
situations. The driving exercises shall include vehicle control 700
in inclement weather conditions, emergency transition maneuvers, 701
and spin and skid control. The driving exercises shall take 702
place in a suitable closed-course facility that is safe and 703
controlled and has adequate run-off areas. The director shall 704
prescribe the requirements for the curriculum to be provided as 705
well as other program directives and the requirements and score 706
necessary to pass the course. A person who attends an advanced 707
juvenile driver improvement program, including for the purpose 708
purposes specified in either section 2152.20, 2152.21, or 709
division (C)(2) of section 4510.31 of the Revised Code, that 710
meets the standards and requirements prescribed in this division 711
for such courses and successfully completes the course shall 712
receive a certificate of completion from the program. 713
Section 2. That existing sections 2152.20, 2152.21, 714
4507.05, 4507.071, 4508.02, and 4510.311 of the Revised Code are 715
hereby repealed. 716